Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2972
Right of director to information.

A director may obtain, inspect, and copy all information regarding the state of activities and financial condition of the limited cooperative association and other information regarding the activities of the limited cooperative association reasonably related to the performance of the director's duties as director but not for any other purpose or in any manner that would violate any duty to the limited cooperative association.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 72.